Washington statutes.
RCW 44.48.140

Cooperation with legislative committees and others.

The committee shall cooperate, act, and function with Washington state legislative committees and may cooperate with the councils or committees of other states similar to this committee and with other interstate research organizations.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 373 s 14.]